Illinois, session 104th, SB2226.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Sections 17-9, 18-5, 18A-5, 18A-15, and 19A-35 and by adding 6Sections 1-14 and 3-8 as follows: 7    (10 ILCS 5/1-14 new)8    Sec. 1-14. Voter Identification Card.9    (a) Issuance. The Secretary of State shall issue a Voter 10Identification Card to each registered voter who does not have 11an acceptable form of photo identification card as defined in 12Section 3-8. The Voter Identification Card shall include at 13least: (i) the voter's name, signature, and photograph; (ii) 14the State seal; and (iii) the voter's current residence 15address. A Voter Identification Card is valid for as long as 16the registered voter maintains the name and residence on the 17Card. A Voter Identification Card may not be used for any 18purpose other than to vote in Illinois.19    (b) Intent and purpose. It is the intent of the General 20Assembly to provide the Secretary of State with guidance on 21how to issue the Voter Identification Card to those 22individuals who do not have an acceptable form of photo 23identification as defined in Section 3-8.  SB2226- 2 -LRB104 05516 SPS 15545 b1    (c) Application for the Voter Identification Card. Within 2a reasonable time after the effective date of this amendatory 3Act of the 104th General Assembly, the Secretary of State 4shall provide application forms for the Voter Identification 5Card. Any registered voter who meets the criteria set forth in 6this Section and who provides the proper documentation 7required under subsection (d) shall receive a Voter 8Identification Card.9    (d) Documentation required. The Secretary of State shall 10require the presentation and verification of the following 11information for issuance of a Voter Registration Card:12        (1) A photo identity document, except that a non-photo 13    identity document, as defined in subsection (e), is 14    acceptable if it includes both the applicant's name and 15    date of birth.16        (2) Documentation showing the applicant's date of 17    birth.18        (3) Evidence of voter registration.19        (4) Documentation, as defined in subsection (f), 20    showing the applicant's name and principal residence 21    address.22    (e) Non-photo identity document. A non-photo identity 23document must include the applicant's name and date of birth. 24Any of the following shall constitute a non-photo identity 25document in lieu of a photo identity document:26        (1) An original birth certificate or certified copy of   SB2226- 3 -LRB104 05516 SPS 15545 b1    a birth certificate.2        (2) A voter registration card.3        (3) A copy of records filed in court by the applicant 4    or on behalf of the applicant by the applicant's counsel.5        (4) A naturalization document.6        (5) A copy of the applicant's marriage license.7        (6) A copy of the State or federal tax return filed by 8    the applicant for the previous calendar year.9        (7) An original of the annual Social Security 10    statement received by the applicant for the current or 11    preceding calendar year.12        (8) An original of a Medicare or Medicaid statement 13    received by the applicant.14        (9) A certified school record or transcript for the 15    current or preceding calendar year.16    (f) Documentation of name and address. Any of the 17following documents shall be acceptable as documentation of 18the applicant's name and current address:19        (1) A voter registration card.20        (2) A utility bill or cable bill.21        (3) A bank statement issued within the last 60 days.22        (4) A valid and current rental agreement.23        (5) A copy of the State or federal tax return filed by 24    the applicant for the previous calendar year.25        (6) A homeowner's insurance policy or bill for the 26    current or preceding year.  SB2226- 4 -LRB104 05516 SPS 15545 b1        (7) A mortgage, deed, or property tax bill for the 2    current or preceding year.3        (8) A W-2 for the preceding calendar year.4    (g) Exemptions. Voters who are indigent and unable to 5obtain a Voter Identification Card without a fee and voters 6who have a religious objection to being photographed may vote 7a provisional ballot and sign an affidavit that indicates one 8of the exemptions stated in this subsection. An indigent 9person is defined as an individual whose income is 125% or less 10of current federal poverty income guidelines. 11    (10 ILCS 5/3-8 new)12    Sec. 3-8. Acceptable forms of photo identification for 13voting purposes. As used in this Code, acceptable forms of 14photo identification for voting purposes include:15        (1) An Illinois Driver's License.16        (2) A State Identification Card.17        (3) An Illinois Disabled Person Identification Card.18        (4) A Senior Citizen Identification Card.19        (5) A FOID Card.20        (6) A U.S. Passport with the voter's current address.21        (7) Any other government-issued identification card 22    that includes the voter's name, current photograph, and 23    current address. 24    All photo identification cards must be valid and current.    SB2226- 5 -LRB104 05516 SPS 15545 b1    (10 ILCS 5/17-9)  (from Ch. 46, par. 17-9)2    Sec. 17-9. Any person desiring to vote shall (i) present 3to the judges of election for verification of the person's 4identity a government-issued photo identification card, as 5defined in Section 3-8, or his or her Voter Identification 6Card and (ii) give his name and, if required to do so, his 7residence to the judges of election, one of whom shall 8thereupon announce the same in a loud and distinct tone of 9voice, clear, and audible; the judges of elections shall check 10each application for ballot against the list of voters 11registered in that precinct to whom grace period, vote by 12mail, or early ballots have been issued for that election, 13which shall be provided by the election authority and which 14list shall be available for inspection by pollwatchers. A 15voter applying to vote in the precinct on election day whose 16name appears on the list as having been issued a grace period, 17vote by mail, or early ballot shall not be permitted to vote in 18the precinct, except that a voter to whom a vote by mail ballot 19was issued may vote in the precinct if the voter submits to the 20election judges that vote by mail ballot for cancellation. If 21the voter is unable to submit the vote by mail ballot, it shall 22be sufficient for the voter to submit to the election judges 23(i) a portion of the vote by mail ballot if the vote by mail 24ballot was torn or mutilated or (ii) an affidavit executed 25before the election judges specifying that (A) the voter never 26received a vote by mail ballot or (B) the voter completed and   SB2226- 6 -LRB104 05516 SPS 15545 b1returned a vote by mail ballot and was informed that the 2election authority did not receive that vote by mail ballot. 3All applicable provisions of Articles 4, 5 or 6 shall be 4complied with and if such name is found on the register of 5voters by the officer having charge thereof, he shall likewise 6repeat said name, and the voter shall be allowed to enter 7within the proximity of the voting booths, as above provided. 8One of the judges shall give the voter one, and only one of 9each ballot to be voted at the election, on the back of which 10ballots such judge shall indorse his initials in such manner 11that they may be seen when each such ballot is properly folded, 12and the voter's name shall be immediately checked on the 13register list. In those election jurisdictions where 14perforated ballot cards are utilized of the type on which 15write-in votes can be cast above the perforation, the election 16authority shall provide a space both above and below the 17perforation for the judge's initials, and the judge shall 18endorse his or her initials in both spaces. Whenever a 19proposal for a constitutional amendment or for the calling of 20a constitutional convention is to be voted upon at the 21election, the separate blue ballot or ballots pertaining 22thereto shall, when being handed to the voter, be placed on top 23of the other ballots to be voted at the election in such manner 24that the legend appearing on the back thereof, as prescribed 25in Section 16-6 of this Act, shall be plainly visible to the 26voter. At all elections, when a registry may be required, if   SB2226- 7 -LRB104 05516 SPS 15545 b1the name of any person so desiring to vote at such election is 2not found on the register of voters, he or she shall not 3receive a ballot until he or she shall have complied with the 4law prescribing the manner and conditions of voting by 5unregistered voters. If any person desiring to vote at any 6election shall be challenged, he or she shall not receive a 7ballot until he or she shall have established his right to vote 8in the manner provided hereinafter; and if he or she shall be 9challenged after he has received his ballot, he shall not be 10permitted to vote until he or she has fully complied with such 11requirements of the law upon being challenged. Besides the 12election officer, not more than 2 voters in excess of the whole 13number of voting booths provided shall be allowed within the 14proximity of the voting booths at one time. The provisions of 15this Act, so far as they require the registration of voters as 16a condition to their being allowed to vote shall not apply to 17persons otherwise entitled to vote, who are, at the time of the 18election, or at any time within 60 days prior to such election 19have been engaged in the military or naval service of the 20United States, and who appear personally at the polling place 21on election day and produce to the judges of election 22satisfactory evidence thereof, but such persons, if otherwise 23qualified to vote, shall be permitted to vote at such election 24without previous registration. 25    All such persons shall also make an affidavit which shall 26be in substantially the following form:   SB2226- 8 -LRB104 05516 SPS 15545 b1State of Illinois,) 2                  ) ss. 3County of ........) 4............... Precinct   .......... Ward5    I, ...., do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I am a citizen 6of the United States, of the age of 18 years or over, and that 7within the past 60 days prior to the date of this election at 8which I am applying to vote, I have been engaged in the .... 9(military or naval) service of the United States; and I am 10qualified to vote under and by virtue of the Constitution and 11laws of the State of Illinois, and that I am a legally 12qualified voter of this precinct and ward except that I have, 13because of such service, been unable to register as a voter; 14that I now reside at .... (insert street and number, if any) in 15this precinct and ward; that I have maintained a legal 16residence in this precinct and ward for 30 days and in this 17State 30 days next preceding this election. 18.........................19    Subscribed and sworn to before me on (insert date). 20.........................21Judge of Election. 22    The affidavit of any such person shall be supported by the 23affidavit of a resident and qualified voter of any such 24precinct and ward, which affidavit shall be in substantially 25the following form:   SB2226- 9 -LRB104 05516 SPS 15545 b1State of Illinois,) 2                  ) ss. 3County of ........) 4........... Precinct   ........... Ward5    I, ...., do solemnly swear (or affirm), that I am a 6resident of this precinct and ward and entitled to vote at this 7election; that I am acquainted with .... (name of the 8applicant); that I verily believe him to be an actual bona fide 9resident of this precinct and ward and that I verily believe 10that he or she has maintained a legal residence therein 30 days 11and in this State 30 days next preceding this election. 12.........................13    Subscribed and sworn to before me on (insert date). 14.........................15Judge of Election. 16    All affidavits made under the provisions of this Section 17shall be enclosed in a separate envelope securely sealed, and 18shall be transmitted with the returns of the elections to the 19county clerk or to the board of election commissioners, who 20shall preserve the said affidavits for the period of 6 months, 21during which period such affidavits shall be deemed public 22records and shall be freely open to examination as such. 23(Source: P.A. 98-1171, eff. 6-1-15.) 24    (10 ILCS 5/18-5)  (from Ch. 46, par. 18-5)  SB2226- 10 -LRB104 05516 SPS 15545 b1    Sec. 18-5. Any person desiring to vote and whose name is 2found upon the register of voters by the person having charge 3thereof, shall (i) present to the judges of election for 4verification of the person's identity a government-issued 5photo identification card, as defined in Section 3-8, or his 6or her Voter Identification Card, (ii) shall then be 7questioned by one of the judges as to his nativity, his term of 8residence at present address, precinct, State and United 9States, his age, whether naturalized and if so the date of 10naturalization papers and court from which secured, and (iii) 11he shall be asked to state his residence when last previously 12registered and the date of the election for which he then 13registered. The judges of elections shall check each 14application for ballot against the list of voters registered 15in that precinct to whom grace period, vote by mail, and early 16ballots have been issued for that election, which shall be 17provided by the election authority and which list shall be 18available for inspection by pollwatchers. A voter applying to 19vote in the precinct on election day whose name appears on the 20list as having been issued a grace period, vote by mail, or 21early ballot shall not be permitted to vote in the precinct, 22except that a voter to whom a vote by mail ballot was issued 23may vote in the precinct if the voter submits to the election 24judges that vote by mail ballot for cancellation. If the voter 25is unable to submit the vote by mail ballot, it shall be 26sufficient for the voter to submit to the election judges (i) a   SB2226- 11 -LRB104 05516 SPS 15545 b1portion of the vote by mail ballot if the vote by mail ballot 2was torn or mutilated or (ii) an affidavit executed before the 3election judges specifying that (A) the voter never received a 4vote by mail ballot or (B) the voter completed and returned a 5vote by mail ballot and was informed that the election 6authority did not receive that vote by mail ballot. If such 7person so registered shall be challenged as disqualified, the 8party challenging shall assign his reasons therefor, and 9thereupon one of the judges shall administer to him an oath to 10answer questions, and if he shall take the oath he shall then 11be questioned by the judge or judges touching such cause of 12challenge, and touching any other cause of disqualification. 13And he may also be questioned by the person challenging him in 14regard to his qualifications and identity. But if a majority 15of the judges are of the opinion that he is the person so 16registered and a qualified voter, his vote shall then be 17received accordingly. But if his vote be rejected by such 18judges, such person may afterward produce and deliver an 19affidavit to such judges, subscribed and sworn to by him 20before one of the judges, in which it shall be stated how long 21he has resided in such precinct, and state; that he is a 22citizen of the United States, and is a duly qualified voter in 23such precinct, and that he is the identical person so 24registered. In addition to such an affidavit, the person so 25challenged shall provide to the judges of election proof of 26residence by producing 2 forms of identification showing the   SB2226- 12 -LRB104 05516 SPS 15545 b1person's current residence address, provided that such 2identification may include a lease or contract for a residence 3and not more than one piece of mail addressed to the person at 4his current residence address and postmarked not earlier than 530 days prior to the date of the election, or the person shall 6procure a witness personally known to the judges of election, 7and resident in the precinct (or district), or who shall be 8proved by some legal voter of such precinct or district, known 9to the judges to be such, who shall take the oath following, 10viz: 11    I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I am a resident of 12this election precinct (or district), and entitled to vote at 13this election, and that I have been a resident of this State 14for 30 days last past, and am well acquainted with the person 15whose vote is now offered; that he is an actual and bona fide 16resident of this election precinct (or district), and has 17resided herein 30 days, and as I verily believe, in this State, 1830 days next preceding this election. 19    The oath in each case may be administered by one of the 20judges of election, or by any officer, resident in the 21precinct or district, authorized by law to administer oaths. 22Also supported by an affidavit by a registered voter residing 23in such precinct, stating his own residence, and that he knows 24such person; and that he does reside at the place mentioned and 25has resided in such precinct and state for the length of time 26as stated by such person, which shall be subscribed and sworn   SB2226- 13 -LRB104 05516 SPS 15545 b1to in the same way. For purposes of this Section, the 2submission of a photo identification issued by a college or 3university, accompanied by either (i) a copy of the 4applicant's contract or lease for a residence or (ii) one 5piece of mail addressed to the person at his or her current 6residence address and postmarked not earlier than 30 days 7prior to the date of the election, shall be sufficient to 8establish proof of residence. Whereupon the vote of such 9person shall be received, and entered as other votes. But such 10judges, having charge of such registers, shall state in their 11respective books the facts in such case, and the affidavits, 12so delivered to the judges, shall be preserved and returned to 13the office of the commissioners of election. Blank affidavits 14of the character aforesaid shall be sent out to the judges of 15all the precincts, and the judges of election shall furnish 16the same on demand and administer the oaths without criticism. 17Such oaths, if administered by any other officer than such 18judge of election, shall not be received. Whenever a proposal 19for a constitutional amendment or for the calling of a 20constitutional convention is to be voted upon at the election, 21the separate blue ballot or ballots pertaining thereto shall 22be placed on top of the other ballots to be voted at the 23election in such manner that the legend appearing on the back 24thereof, as prescribed in Section 16-6 of this Act, shall be 25plainly visible to the voter, and in this fashion the ballots 26shall be handed to the voter by the judge.   SB2226- 14 -LRB104 05516 SPS 15545 b1    Immediately after voting, the voter shall be instructed 2whether the voting equipment, if used, accepted or rejected 3the ballot or identified the ballot as under-voted. A voter 4whose ballot is identified as under-voted for a statewide 5constitutional office may return to the voting booth and 6complete the voting of that ballot. A voter whose ballot is not 7accepted by the voting equipment may, upon surrendering the 8ballot, request and vote another ballot. The voter's 9surrendered ballot shall be initialed by the election judge 10and handled as provided in the appropriate Article governing 11that voting equipment.12    The voter shall, upon quitting the voting booth, deliver 13to one of the judges of election all of the ballots, properly 14folded, which he received. The judge of election to whom the 15voter delivers his ballots shall not accept the same unless 16all of the ballots given to the voter are returned by him. If a 17voter delivers less than all of the ballots given to him, the 18judge to whom the same are offered shall advise him in a voice 19clearly audible to the other judges of election that the voter 20must return the remainder of the ballots. The statement of the 21judge to the voter shall clearly express the fact that the 22voter is not required to vote such remaining ballots but that 23whether or not he votes them he must fold and deliver them to 24the judge. In making such statement the judge of election 25shall not indicate by word, gesture or intonation of voice 26that the unreturned ballots shall be voted in any particular   SB2226- 15 -LRB104 05516 SPS 15545 b1manner. No new voter shall be permitted to enter the voting 2booth of a voter who has failed to deliver the total number of 3ballots received by him until such voter has returned to the 4voting booth pursuant to the judge's request and again quit 5the booth with all of the ballots required to be returned by 6him. Upon receipt of all such ballots the judges of election 7shall enter the name of the voter, and his number, as above 8provided in this Section, and the judge to whom the ballots are 9delivered shall immediately put the ballots into the ballot 10box. If any voter who has failed to deliver all the ballots 11received by him refuses to return to the voting booth after 12being advised by the judge of election as herein provided, the 13judge shall inform the other judges of such refusal, and 14thereupon the ballot or ballots returned to the judge shall be 15deposited in the ballot box, the voter shall be permitted to 16depart from the polling place, and a new voter shall be 17permitted to enter the voting booth. 18    The judge of election who receives the ballot or ballots 19from the voter shall announce the residence and name of such 20voter in a loud voice. The judge shall put the ballot or 21ballots received from the voter into the ballot box in the 22presence of the voter and the judges of election, and in plain 23view of the public. The judges having charge of such registers 24shall then, in a column prepared thereon, in the same line of, 25the name of the voter, mark "Voted" or the letter "V". 26    No judge of election shall accept from any voter less than   SB2226- 16 -LRB104 05516 SPS 15545 b1the full number of ballots received by such voter without 2first advising the voter in the manner above provided of the 3necessity of returning all of the ballots, nor shall any such 4judge advise such voter in a manner contrary to that which is 5herein permitted, or in any other manner violate the 6provisions of this Section; provided, that the acceptance by a 7judge of election of less than the full number of ballots 8delivered to a voter who refuses to return to the voting booth 9after being properly advised by such judge shall not be a 10violation of this Section. 11(Source: P.A. 98-1171, eff. 6-1-15.) 12    (10 ILCS 5/18A-5)13    Sec. 18A-5. Provisional voting; general provisions. 14    (a) A person who claims to be a registered voter is 15entitled to cast a provisional ballot under the following 16circumstances:17        (1) The person's name does not appear on the official 18    list of eligible voters for the precinct in which the 19    person seeks to vote and the person has refused an 20    opportunity to register at the polling location or another 21    grace period registration site. The official list is the 22    centralized statewide voter registration list established 23    and maintained in accordance with Section 1A-25;24        (2) The person's voting status has been challenged by 25    an election judge, a pollwatcher, or any legal voter and   SB2226- 17 -LRB104 05516 SPS 15545 b1    that challenge has been sustained by a majority of the 2    election judges;3        (3) A federal or State court order extends the time 4    for closing the polls beyond the time period established 5    by State law and the person votes during the extended time 6    period;7        (4) The voter registered to vote by mail and is 8    required by law to present identification when voting 9    either in person, in the case of a voter who registered by 10    mail, when voting or by early voting ballot, but fails to 11    provide an acceptable form of photo identification as 12    described in Section 3-8, or a Voter Identification Card 13    issued under Section 1-14 do so; 14        (5) The voter's name appears on the list of voters who 15    voted during the early voting period, but the voter claims 16    not to have voted during the early voting period; 17        (6) The voter received a vote by mail ballot but did 18    not return the vote by mail ballot to the election 19    authority; or 20        (7) The voter attempted to register to vote on 21    election day, but failed to provide the necessary 22    documentation. 23    (b) The procedure for obtaining and casting a provisional 24ballot at the polling place shall be as follows:25        (1) After first verifying through an examination of 26    the precinct register that the person's address is within   SB2226- 18 -LRB104 05516 SPS 15545 b1    the precinct boundaries, an election judge at the polling 2    place shall notify a person who is entitled to cast a 3    provisional ballot pursuant to subsection (a) that he or 4    she may cast a provisional ballot in that election. An 5    election judge must accept any information provided by a 6    person who casts a provisional ballot that the person 7    believes supports his or her claim that he or she is a duly 8    registered voter and qualified to vote in the election. 9    However, if the person's residence address is outside the 10    precinct boundaries, the election judge shall inform the 11    person of that fact, give the person the appropriate 12    telephone number of the election authority in order to 13    locate the polling place assigned to serve that address, 14    and instruct the person to go to the proper polling place 15    to vote. 16        (2) The person shall execute a written form provided 17    by the election judge that shall state or contain all of 18    the following that is available:19             (i) an affidavit stating the following:20                State of Illinois, County of ................, 21            Township ............., Precinct ........, Ward 22            ........, I, ......................., do solemnly 23            swear (or affirm) that: I am a citizen of the 24            United States; I am 18 years of age or older; I 25            have resided in this State and in this precinct 26            for 30 days preceding this election; I have not   SB2226- 19 -LRB104 05516 SPS 15545 b1            voted in this election; I am a duly registered 2            voter in every respect; and I am eligible to vote 3            in this election. Signature ...... Printed Name of 4            Voter ....... Printed Residence Address of Voter 5            ...... City ...... State .... Zip Code ..... 6            Telephone Number ...... Date of Birth ....... and 7            Illinois Driver's License Number ....... or Last 4 8            digits of Social Security Number ...... or State 9            Identification Card Number issued to you by the 10            Illinois Secretary of State ........11            (ii) A box for the election judge to check one of 12        the reasons why the person was given a provisional 13        ballot under subsection (a) of this Section.14            (iii) An area for the election judge to affix his 15        or her signature and to set forth any facts that 16        support or oppose the allegation that the person is 17        not qualified to vote in the precinct in which the 18        person is seeking to vote.19        The written affidavit form described in this 20    subsection (b)(2) must be printed on a multi-part form 21    prescribed by the county clerk or board of election 22    commissioners, as the case may be.23        (3) After the person executes the portion of the 24    written affidavit described in subsection (b)(2)(i) of 25    this Section, the election judge shall complete the 26    portion of the written affidavit described in subsection   SB2226- 20 -LRB104 05516 SPS 15545 b1    (b)(2)(iii) and (b)(2)(iv).2        (4) The election judge shall give a copy of the 3    completed written affidavit to the person. The election 4    judge shall place the original written affidavit in a 5    self-adhesive clear plastic packing list envelope that 6    must be attached to a separate envelope marked as a 7    "provisional ballot envelope". The election judge shall 8    also place any information provided by the person who 9    casts a provisional ballot in the clear plastic packing 10    list envelope. Each county clerk or board of election 11    commissioners, as the case may be, must design, obtain or 12    procure self-adhesive clear plastic packing list envelopes 13    and provisional ballot envelopes that are suitable for 14    implementing this subsection (b)(4) of this Section.15        (5) The election judge shall provide the person with a 16    provisional ballot, written instructions for casting a 17    provisional ballot, and the provisional ballot envelope 18    with the clear plastic packing list envelope affixed to 19    it, which contains the person's original written affidavit 20    and, if any, information provided by the provisional voter 21    to support his or her claim that he or she is a duly 22    registered voter. An election judge must also give the 23    person written information that states that any person who 24    casts a provisional ballot shall be able to ascertain, 25    pursuant to guidelines established by the State Board of 26    Elections, whether the provisional vote was counted in the   SB2226- 21 -LRB104 05516 SPS 15545 b1    official canvass of votes for that election and, if the 2    provisional vote was not counted, the reason that the vote 3    was not counted.4        (6) After the person has completed marking his or her 5    provisional ballot, he or she shall place the marked 6    ballot inside of the provisional ballot envelope, close 7    and seal the envelope, and return the envelope to an 8    election judge, who shall then deposit the sealed 9    provisional ballot envelope into a securable container 10    separately identified and utilized for containing sealed 11    provisional ballot envelopes. Ballots that are provisional 12    because they are cast after 7:00 p.m. by court order shall 13    be kept separate from other provisional ballots. Upon the 14    closing of the polls, the securable container shall be 15    sealed with filament tape provided for that purpose, which 16    shall be wrapped around the box lengthwise and crosswise, 17    at least twice each way, and each of the election judges 18    shall sign the seal.19    (c) Instead of the affidavit form described in subsection 20(b), the county clerk or board of election commissioners, as 21the case may be, may design and use a multi-part affidavit form 22that is imprinted upon or attached to the provisional ballot 23envelope described in subsection (b). If a county clerk or 24board of election commissioners elects to design and use its 25own multi-part affidavit form, then the county clerk or board 26of election commissioners shall establish a mechanism for   SB2226- 22 -LRB104 05516 SPS 15545 b1accepting any information the provisional voter has supplied 2to the election judge to support his or her claim that he or 3she is a duly registered voter. In all other respects, a county 4clerk or board of election commissioners shall establish 5procedures consistent with subsection (b).6    (d) The county clerk or board of election commissioners, 7as the case may be, shall use the completed affidavit form 8described in subsection (b) to update the person's voter 9registration information in the State voter registration 10database and voter registration database of the county clerk 11or board of election commissioners, as the case may be. If a 12person is later determined not to be a registered voter based 13on Section 18A-15 of this Code, then the affidavit shall be 14processed by the county clerk or board of election 15commissioners, as the case may be, as a voter registration 16application.17(Source: P.A. 100-201, eff. 8-18-17.) 18    (10 ILCS 5/18A-15)19    Sec. 18A-15. Validating and counting provisional ballots. 20    (a) The county clerk or board of election commissioners 21shall complete the validation and counting of provisional 22ballots within 14 calendar days of the day of the election. The 23county clerk or board of election commissioners shall have 7 24calendar days from the completion of the validation and 25counting of provisional ballots to conduct its final canvass.   SB2226- 23 -LRB104 05516 SPS 15545 b1The State Board of Elections shall complete within 31 calendar 2days of the election or sooner if all the returns are received, 3its final canvass of the vote for all public offices.4    (b) If a county clerk or board of election commissioners 5determines that all of the following apply, then a provisional 6ballot is valid and shall be counted as a vote:7        (1) the provisional voter cast the provisional ballot 8    in the correct precinct based on the address provided by 9    the provisional voter. The provisional voter's affidavit 10    shall serve as a change of address request by that voter 11    for registration purposes for the next ensuing election if 12    it bears an address different from that in the records of 13    the election authority. Votes for federal and statewide 14    offices on a provisional ballot cast in the incorrect 15    precinct that meet the other requirements of this 16    subsection shall be valid and counted in accordance with 17    this Article. As used in this item, "federal office" is 18    defined as provided in Section 20-1 and "statewide office" 19    means the Governor, Attorney General, Secretary of State, 20    Comptroller, and Treasurer. Votes for General Assembly, 21    countywide, citywide, or township office on a provisional 22    ballot cast in the incorrect precinct but in the correct 23    legislative district, representative district, county, 24    municipality, or township, as the case may be, shall be 25    valid and counted in accordance with this Article. As used 26    in this item, "citywide office" means an office elected by   SB2226- 24 -LRB104 05516 SPS 15545 b1    the electors of an entire municipality. As used in this 2    item, "township office" means an office elected by the 3    electors of an entire township;4        (2) the affidavit executed by the provisional voter 5    pursuant to subsection (b)(2) of Section 18A-5 contains, 6    at a minimum, the provisional voter's first and last name, 7    house number and street name, and signature or mark;8        (3) except as permitted by item (5) of subsection (b) 9    of this Section, the provisional voter is a registered 10    voter based on information available to the county clerk 11    or board of election commissioners provided by or obtained 12    from any of the following:13            i. the provisional voter;14            ii. an election judge;15            iii. the statewide voter registration database 16        maintained by the State Board of Elections;17            iv. the records of the county clerk or board of 18        election commissioners' database; or19            v. the records of the Secretary of State; and20        (4) for a provisional ballot cast under item (6) of 21    subsection (a) of Section 18A-5, the voter did not vote by 22    mail ballot in the election at which the provisional 23    ballot was cast; or 24        (5) for a provisional ballot cast under item (7) of 25    subsection (a) of Section 18A-5, the voter provides the 26    election authority with the necessary documentation within   SB2226- 25 -LRB104 05516 SPS 15545 b1    7 days of election day. 2    (c) With respect to subsection (b)(3) of this Section, the 3county clerk or board of election commissioners shall 4investigate and record whether or not the specified 5information is available from each of the 5 identified 6sources. If the information is available from one or more of 7the identified sources, then the county clerk or board of 8election commissioners shall seek to obtain the information 9from each of those sources until satisfied, with information 10from at least one of those sources, that the provisional voter 11is registered and entitled to vote. The county clerk or board 12of election commissioners shall use any information it obtains 13as the basis for determining the voter registration status of 14the provisional voter. If a conflict exists among the 15information available to the county clerk or board of election 16commissioners as to the registration status of the provisional 17voter, then the county clerk or board of election 18commissioners shall make a determination based on the totality 19of the circumstances. In a case where the above information 20equally supports or opposes the registration status of the 21voter, the county clerk or board of election commissioners 22shall decide in favor of the provisional voter as being duly 23registered to vote. If the statewide voter registration 24database maintained by the State Board of Elections indicates 25that the provisional voter is registered to vote, but the 26county clerk's or board of election commissioners' voter   SB2226- 26 -LRB104 05516 SPS 15545 b1registration database indicates that the provisional voter is 2not registered to vote, then the information found in the 3statewide voter registration database shall control the matter 4and the provisional voter shall be deemed to be registered to 5vote. If the records of the county clerk or board of election 6commissioners indicates that the provisional voter is 7registered to vote, but the statewide voter registration 8database maintained by the State Board of Elections indicates 9that the provisional voter is not registered to vote, then the 10information found in the records of the county clerk or board 11of election commissioners shall control the matter and the 12provisional voter shall be deemed to be registered to vote. If 13the provisional voter's signature on his or her provisional 14ballot request varies from the signature on an otherwise valid 15registration application solely because of the substitution of 16initials for the first or middle name, the election authority 17may not reject the provisional ballot.18    (d) In validating the registration status of a person 19casting a provisional ballot, the county clerk or board of 20election commissioners shall not require a provisional voter 21to complete any form other than the affidavit executed by the 22provisional voter under subsection (b)(2) of Section 18A-5. In 23addition, the county clerk or board of election commissioners 24shall not require all provisional voters or any particular 25class or group of provisional voters to appear personally 26before the county clerk or board of election commissioners or   SB2226- 27 -LRB104 05516 SPS 15545 b1as a matter of policy require provisional voters to submit 2additional information to verify or otherwise support the 3information already submitted by the provisional voter. Within 42 calendar days after the election, the election authority 5shall transmit by electronic means pursuant to a process 6established by the State Board of Elections the name, street 7address, e-mail address, and precinct, ward, township, and 8district numbers, as the case may be, of each person casting a 9provisional ballot to the State Board of Elections, which 10shall maintain those names and that information in an 11electronic format on its website, arranged by county and 12accessible to State and local political committees. The 13provisional voter may, within 7 calendar days after the 14election, submit additional information to the county clerk or 15board of election commissioners, except that in the case of 16provisional voting under paragraph (4) of subsection (a) of 17Section 18A-5, the provisional voter has 10 days to provide 18the county clerk or board of election commissioners with the 19required photo identification card. This information must be 20received by the county clerk or board of election 21commissioners within the applicable 7-calendar-day or 2210-calendar-day period.23    (e) If the county clerk or board of election commissioners 24determines that subsection (b)(1), (b)(2), or (b)(3) does not 25apply, then the provisional ballot is not valid and may not be 26counted. The provisional ballot envelope containing the ballot   SB2226- 28 -LRB104 05516 SPS 15545 b1cast by the provisional voter may not be opened. The county 2clerk or board of election commissioners shall write on the 3provisional ballot envelope the following: "Provisional ballot 4determined invalid.".5    (f) If the county clerk or board of election commissioners 6determines that a provisional ballot is valid under this 7Section, then the provisional ballot envelope shall be opened. 8The outside of each provisional ballot envelope shall also be 9marked to identify the precinct and the date of the election.10    (g) Provisional ballots determined to be valid shall be 11counted at the election authority's central ballot counting 12location and shall not be counted in precincts. The 13provisional ballots determined to be valid shall be added to 14the vote totals for the precincts from which they were cast in 15the order in which the ballots were opened. The validation and 16counting of provisional ballots shall be subject to the 17provisions of this Code that apply to pollwatchers. If the 18provisional ballots are a ballot of a punch card voting 19system, then the provisional ballot shall be counted in a 20manner consistent with Article 24A. If the provisional ballots 21are a ballot of optical scan or other type of approved 22electronic voting system, then the provisional ballots shall 23be counted in a manner consistent with Article 24B.24    (h) As soon as the ballots have been counted, the election 25judges or election officials shall, in the presence of the 26county clerk or board of election commissioners, place each of   SB2226- 29 -LRB104 05516 SPS 15545 b1the following items in a separate envelope or bag: (1) all 2provisional ballots, voted or spoiled; (2) all provisional 3ballot envelopes of provisional ballots voted or spoiled; and 4(3) all executed affidavits of the provisional ballots voted 5or spoiled. All provisional ballot envelopes for provisional 6voters who have been determined not to be registered to vote 7shall remain sealed. The county clerk or board of election 8commissioners shall treat the provisional ballot envelope 9containing the written affidavit as a voter registration 10application for that person for the next election and process 11that application. The election judges or election officials 12shall then securely seal each envelope or bag, initial the 13envelope or bag, and plainly mark on the outside of the 14envelope or bag in ink the precinct in which the provisional 15ballots were cast. The election judges or election officials 16shall then place each sealed envelope or bag into a box, secure 17and seal it in the same manner as described in item (6) of 18subsection (b) of Section 18A-5. Each election judge or 19election official shall take and subscribe an oath before the 20county clerk or board of election commissioners that the 21election judge or election official securely kept the ballots 22and papers in the box, did not permit any person to open the 23box or otherwise touch or tamper with the ballots and papers in 24the box, and has no knowledge of any other person opening the 25box. For purposes of this Section, the term "election 26official" means the county clerk, a member of the board of   SB2226- 30 -LRB104 05516 SPS 15545 b1election commissioners, as the case may be, and their 2respective employees.3(Source: P.A. 97-766, eff. 7-6-12; 98-115, eff. 7-29-13; 498-691, eff. 7-1-14; 98-1171, eff. 6-1-15.) 5    (10 ILCS 5/19A-35)6    Sec. 19A-35. Procedure for voting.7    (a) Not more than 23 days before the start of the election, 8the county clerk shall make available to the election official 9conducting early voting by personal appearance a sufficient 10number of early ballots, envelopes, and printed voting 11instruction slips for the use of early voters. The election 12official shall receipt for all ballots received and shall 13return unused or spoiled ballots at the close of the early 14voting period to the county clerk and must strictly account 15for all ballots received. The ballots delivered to the 16election official must include early ballots for each precinct 17in the election authority's jurisdiction and must include 18separate ballots for each political subdivision conducting an 19election of officers or a referendum at that election.20    (b) In conducting early voting under this Article, the 21election judge or official is required to verify the signature 22of the early voter by comparison with the signature on the 23official registration card, and the judge or official must 24verify (i) that the applicant is a registered voter, (ii) the 25precinct in which the applicant is registered, and (iii) the   SB2226- 31 -LRB104 05516 SPS 15545 b1proper ballots of the political subdivision in which the 2applicant resides and is entitled to vote, and (iv) the 3applicant's identity, which must be verified by the 4applicant's presentation of a government-issued photo 5identification card, as defined in Section 3-8, or his or her 6Voter Identification Card, before providing an early ballot to 7the applicant. The election judge or official must verify the 8applicant's registration from the most recent poll list 9provided by the election authority, and if the applicant is 10not listed on that poll list, by telephoning the office of the 11election authority.12    (b-5) A person requesting an early voting ballot to whom a 13vote by mail ballot was issued may vote early if the person 14submits that vote by mail ballot to the judges of election or 15official conducting early voting for cancellation. If the 16voter is unable to submit the vote by mail ballot, it shall be 17sufficient for the voter to submit to the judges or official 18(i) a portion of the vote by mail ballot if the vote by mail 19ballot was torn or mutilated or (ii) an affidavit executed 20before the judges or official specifying that (A) the voter 21never received a vote by mail ballot or (B) the voter completed 22and returned a vote by mail ballot and was informed that the 23election authority did not receive that vote by mail ballot.24    (b-10) Within one day after a voter casts an early voting 25ballot, the election authority shall transmit the voter's 26name, street address, and precinct, ward, township, and   SB2226- 32 -LRB104 05516 SPS 15545 b1district numbers, as the case may be, to the State Board of 2Elections, which shall maintain those names and that 3information in an electronic format on its website, arranged 4by county and accessible to State and local political 5committees.6    (b-15) Immediately after voting an early ballot, the voter 7shall be instructed whether the voting equipment accepted or 8rejected the ballot or identified that ballot as under-voted 9for a statewide constitutional office. A voter whose ballot is 10identified as under-voted may return to the voting booth and 11complete the voting of that ballot. A voter whose early voting 12ballot is not accepted by the voting equipment may, upon 13surrendering the ballot, request and vote another early voting 14ballot. The voter's surrendered ballot shall be initialed by 15the election judge or official conducting the early voting and 16handled as provided in the appropriate Article governing the 17voting equipment used. 18    (c) The sealed early ballots in their carrier envelope 19shall be delivered by the election authority to the central 20ballot counting location before the close of the polls on the 21day of the election. 22(Source: P.A. 98-691, eff. 7-1-14; 98-1171, eff. 6-1-15.)